Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2724
Limited contact, defined.

Limited contact means incidental contacts between animals from different flocks off the flock's premises such as at fairs, shows, exhibitions, and sales; between ewes being inseminated, flushed, or implanted; or between rams at ram test or collection stations. Embryo transfer and artificial insemination equipment and surgical tools shall be sterilized before each use for these contacts to be considered limited contacts. Limited contacts do not include any contact, incidental or otherwise, with animals in the same flock or with an animal during or up to thirty days after a female animal lambed, kidded, or aborted or when there is any visible vaginal discharge. Limited contacts do not include any activity where uninhibited contact occurs, such as sharing an enclosure, sharing a section of a transport vehicle, or residing in other flocks for breeding or other purposes, except as allowed by the scrapie flock certification program standards.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 24.